Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2611
Failure to maintain registered agent or registered office or pay annual fee.

If a limited liability company has failed for ninety days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, has failed for ninety days after change of its registered office or registered agent to file with the Secretary of State a statement of the change, or has failed to pay any fee required by section 21-2634, it shall be deemed to be transacting business within this state without authority and to have forfeited any franchises, rights, or privileges acquired under the laws of this state. The Secretary of State shall mail a notice of failure to comply to the limited liability company at its registered office by certified mail. Unless the limited liability company comes into compliance within thirty days after the delivery of notice, the limited liability company shall be deemed to be defunct and to have forfeited its certificate of organization. A defunct limited liability company may at any time after the forfeiture of its certificate be revived and reinstated by filing any necessary documents, paying any fees, and paying an additional fee of one hundred dollars. A revived and reinstated limited liability company shall have the same force and effect as if its existence had not been defunct.

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 30;

Laws 2008, LB907, § 4.
January 1, 2013